Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.1501

Financial literacy—Report to governor and legislature.

The director or his or her designee shall convene an interagency work group to identify current state-funded efforts to support financial literacy, assess whether there are opportunities to create a centralized location of information regarding these existing state efforts, and to identify whether there are opportunities for expanding partnerships with other community entities also providing financial literacy services. A report of the findings and recommendations of this interagency work group shall be due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

[ 2008 c 3 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 3: See note following RCW 43.320.045.